California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(o) If a person subject to this section is not fluent in English, the county department shall provide an understandable explanation of the requirements of this section in a language in which the person is fluent.

(p) (1) No sooner than July 1, 2027, all individuals described in subdivisions (d) and (e) who are 19 years of age or older shall not be eligible for dental services set forth in this chapter, except for the treatment of an emergency medical condition and medical care directly related to the emergency, as defined in federal law.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to nonminor dependents, as defined in Section 11400, and individuals who but for their immigration status are eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to Section 14005.28. These individuals shall remain eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits until their 26th birthday.

(3) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to individuals who are pregnant or entitled to postpartum medical assistance.

(q) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letter, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(r) Subdivisions (d) and (p) shall be implemented only after the director determines, and communicates in writing to the Department of Finance, that systems have been programmed for implementation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 18.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.6.

(a) A recipient who maintains a residence outside of this state for a period of at least two months shall not be eligible for services under this chapter where the county has made inquiry of the recipient pursuant to Section 11100, and where the recipient has not responded to this inquiry by clearly showing that he or she has (1) not established residence elsewhere; or (2) been prevented by illness or other
 good cause from returning to this state.

(b) If a recipient whose services are terminated pursuant to subdivision (a) reapplies for services, services shall be restored provided all other eligibility criteria are met and the individual is considered a resident pursuant to Section 14007.15.

(c) To the extent otherwise required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2015. The department may thereafter readopt the emergency regulations pursuant to that chapter. The adoption and readoption, by the department, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of
 the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(d) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained. 

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 20.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.65.

(a) Persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States who were receiving long-term care services under the authority of subdivision (f) of Section 1 of Chapter 1441 of the Statutes of 1988 on the day prior to the effective date of this section shall continue to receive those long-term care services.

(b) On or after the effective date of this section, any applicant who is not lawfully present in the United States, who is otherwise eligible for Medi-Cal services, but who does not meet the requirements under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 14007.5,
 would be eligible to receive federally reimbursable long-term care services pursuant to the Medicaid program provided for pursuant to Title 19 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), shall be eligible to receive long-term care services to the extent that funding is made available for this purpose in the annual Budget Act. In no event shall expenditures for this program exceed the amount necessary to serve 110 percent of the 1999–2000 estimated eligible population without further authorization by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 78.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.7.

Any person who is not a citizen or national of the United States who is otherwise eligible for Medi-Cal services, but who does not meet the requirements under subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 14007.5, shall be eligible for medically necessary pregnancy-related services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 74.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.705.

(a) Through its courts and statutes, and under its Constitution, California protects a woman’s right to reproductive privacy. California reaffirms these protections and specifically its Supreme Court decision in People v. Belous (1969) 71 Cal.2d 954, 966-68.

(b) The State Department of Health Services and the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board may accept or use moneys under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (known as the State Children’s Health Insurance Program or
 S-CHIP), as interpreted in Section 457.10 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to fund services for women pursuant to Section 14007.7 (Medi-Cal) and Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695) (Access for Infants and Mothers (AIM)) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code only when, during the period of coverage, the woman is the beneficiary. The scope of services covered under Medi-Cal and AIM, as defined in statutes, regulations, and state plans, is not altered by this section or the state plan amendment submitted pursuant to this section.

(c) California’s S-CHIP plan and any amendments submitted and implemented pursuant to this section shall be consistent with subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) This section is a declaration of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 23, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.71.

(a) The department shall adopt the option made available under Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVIII) of Title 42 of the United States Code, to provide medical assistance during the period in which an individual described in subdivision (c) of Section 104162 of the Health and Safety Code requires treatment for breast or cervical cancer. In addition, to assist in the delivery of timely and continuing breast cancer and cervical cancer treatment, a state benefits identification card shall be issued by the department within four working days of the date in which the individual submits application information that demonstrates to the provider, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 104162 of the Health
 and Safety Code, that the individual meets the federal criteria described in Section 1902a(aa) of the federal Social Security Act (Section 1396a(aa) of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who meets the definition of the term defined in Section 1641 of Title 8 of the United States Code shall not be determined ineligible for services under this section solely on the basis of the individual’s date of entry into the United States.

(c) The department shall file all necessary state plan amendments to implement the requirements of this section.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code,
 the department shall implement this section, and Article 1.3 (commencing with Section 104150) and Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 104160) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction, without taking any further regulatory action. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations to implement this section in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall make eligibility determinations and redeterminations necessary for applicants and beneficiaries to obtain services pursuant to this section as provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et
 seq.).

(f) Except for those individuals described in subdivision (b) and notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the department determines that federal financial participation, as provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396a, et seq.), is available.

(g) The department shall implement this section on January 1, 2002, if a state plan amendment adopting the option described in subdivision (a), has been approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or at the time state plan amendment is approved, if a later date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 75.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.8.

(a) (1) An individual who is 25 years of age or younger, and who does not have satisfactory immigration status or is unable to establish satisfactory immigration status as required by Section 14011.2, shall be eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits, subject to the service limitations described in subdivisions (b), (c), and (k), if they are otherwise eligible for benefits under this chapter.

(2) (A) After the director determines, and communicates that determination in writing to the Department of Finance, that systems have been programmed for implementation of this subparagraph, but no sooner than May 1, 2022, an individual who is 50 years of age or older, and who does not have satisfactory immigration
 status or is unable to establish satisfactory immigration status as required by Section 14011.2, shall be eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits, subject to the service limitations described in subdivisions (b), (c), and (k), if they are otherwise eligible for benefits under this chapter.

(B) After the director determines, and communicates that determination in writing to the Department of Finance, that systems have been programmed for implementation of this subparagraph, but no later than January 1, 2024, an individual who is 26 to 49 years of age, inclusive, and who does not have satisfactory immigration status as required by Section 14011.2, shall be eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits, subject to the service limitations described in subdivisions (b), (c), and (k), if they are otherwise eligible for benefits under this chapter.

(b) (1) No sooner than January 1, 2026, an individual who is 19 years of age or older, who does not have satisfactory immigration status as required by Section 14011.2, who is otherwise eligible for Medi-Cal services pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14007.5, and who applies for Medi-Cal on or after January 1, 2026, shall only be eligible for medically necessary pregnancy-related services, and care and services necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition and medical care directly related to the emergency, as defined in federal law.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an individual who is 19 years of age or older, who does not have satisfactory immigration status as required by Section 14011.2, who was enrolled in
 full-scope Medi-Cal and was not pregnant, but loses coverage for full-scope Medi-Cal, shall be eligible to reenroll in full-scope Medi-Cal within three months from the date of disenrollment for full-scope Medi-Cal, pregnancy-only Medi-Cal, or postpartum Medi-Cal. Payment of outstanding premium balances prior to the initiation of the three-month cure period shall be a condition of reenrollment under this subdivision for individuals disenrolled from Medi-Cal due to nonpayment of premiums. For purposes of this paragraph, “full-scope Medi-Cal” means the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits, subject to the service limitations described in subdivision (k).

(3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not apply to nonminor dependents, as defined in Section 11400, and individuals who but for their immigration status are eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to Section 14005.28. These individuals shall remain eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits until their 26th
 birthday.

(c) (1) No sooner than January 1, 2026, if an individual described in subdivision (a) who is 19 years of age or older loses eligibility for full-scope Medi-Cal on or after January 1, 2026, the individual shall only be eligible for medically necessary pregnancy-related services, and care and services necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition and medical care directly related to the emergency, as defined in federal law.

(2) No sooner than January 1, 2026, notwithstanding paragraph (1), if an individual described in subdivision (a) who is 19 years of age or older loses eligibility for full-scope Medi-Cal while pregnant, the individual shall remain eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits, subject to the service limitations described in subdivision (k), throughout the pregnancy and for 12 months after the pregnancy ends.

(3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not apply to nonminor dependents, as defined in Section 11400, and individuals who but for their immigration status are eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to Section 14005.28. These individuals shall remain eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits until their 26th birthday.

(d) The department shall provide monthly updates to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on the status of the implementation of this section.

(e) Effective no sooner than January 1, 2027, to the extent permitted by state and federal law, an individual eligible for the Medi-Cal program pursuant to this section shall be eligible for services in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system.

(f) (1) The
 department shall maximize federal financial participation in implementing this section to the extent allowable. For purposes of implementing this section, the department shall claim federal financial participation to the extent that the department determines it is available.

(2) To the extent that federal financial participation is unavailable, the department shall implement this section using state funds appropriated for this purpose.

(g) This section shall be implemented only to the extent it is in compliance with Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make
 specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(i) In implementing this section, the department may contract, as necessary, on a bid or nonbid basis. This subdivision establishes an accelerated process for issuing contracts pursuant to this section. Those contracts, and any other contracts entered into pursuant to this subdivision,
 may be on a noncompetitive bid basis and shall be exempt from both of the following:

(1) Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by that part.

(2) Review or approval of contracts by the Department of General Services.

(j) (1) (A) No sooner than July 1, 2027, all individuals described in subdivision (a), except for those individuals described in subparagraph (B), shall be required to pay a monthly premium as a condition of eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits, if they are otherwise eligible for benefits under this chapter.

(B) The following individuals are not subject to the monthly premium requirements described in
 subparagraph (A):

(i) Individuals under 19 years of age.

(ii) Individuals over 59 years of age.

(iii) Individuals who are pregnant or entitled to postpartum medical assistance.

(iv) Individuals enrolled in the county or state Medi-Cal Inmate Eligibility Program.

(2) No sooner than May 14, 2027, the Governor’s 2027–28 May Revision shall include the level of monthly premiums imposed under this subdivision, which shall be no less than thirty dollars ($30) and no greater than fifty dollars ($50) per beneficiary.

(3) An individual described in paragraph (1), after no more than 90 days of nonpayment of the monthly premium, will
 only be eligible for medically necessary pregnancy-related services, and care and services necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition and medical care directly related to the emergency, as defined in federal law. All outstanding premium balances shall be paid in full as a condition of continued eligibility for full-scope Medi-Cal coverage, subject to the service limitations described in subdivision (k).

(4) The monthly premium requirements and service limitations described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) shall not apply to nonminor dependents, as defined in Section 11400, and individuals who but for their immigration status are eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to Section 14005.28. These individuals shall remain eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits until their 26th birthday.

(k) (1) No sooner than July 1, 2027, an individual who is
 19 years of age or older, who is eligible for Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to subdivision (a), shall not be eligible for dental services set forth in this chapter, except for the treatment of an emergency medical condition and medical care directly related to the emergency, as defined in federal law.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to nonminor dependents, as defined in Section 11400, and individuals who but for their immigration status are eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to Section 14005.28. These individuals shall remain eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits until their 26th birthday.

(3) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to individuals who are pregnant or entitled to postpartum medical assistance.

(l) Subdivisions (b), (c), (j), and (k) shall be implemented only after the director determines, and communicates in writing to the Department of Finance, that systems have been programmed for implementation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 19.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.9.

(a) (1) The department shall adopt the option made available under Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XIII) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XIII)). In order to be eligible for benefits under this section, an individual shall be required to meet all of the following requirements:

(A) The individual’s net countable income is less than 250 percent of the federal poverty level for one person or, if the deeming of spousal income applies to the individual, the individual’s net countable income is less than 250 percent of the federal poverty level for two persons.

(B) The individual is disabled under Title II of the federal Social Security Act (42
 U.S.C. Sec. 401 et seq.), Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.), or Section 1902(v) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(v)). An individual shall be determined to be eligible under this section without regard to their ability to engage in, or actual engagement in, substantial gainful activity, as defined in Section 223(d)(4) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 423(d)(4)).

(C) The individual’s countable
 resources shall not exceed the maximum levels established in subdivision (a) of Section 14005.62. The determination of countable resources shall follow the methodology used under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.), as applicable.

(2) To the extent federal financial participation is available, an individual otherwise eligible under this section, but who is temporarily unemployed, may elect to remain on Medi-Cal under this section for up to 26 weeks, provided the individual continues to pay premiums during the temporary period of unemployment, for coverage periods in which premiums are imposed.

(b) (1) Countable income shall be determined under Section 1612 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1382a), except that the individual’s disability income, including all
 federal and state disability benefits and private disability insurance, shall be exempted. Resources excluded under Section 1613 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1382b) shall be disregarded.

(2) Resources in the form of employer or individual retirement arrangements authorized under the Internal Revenue Code shall be exempted as authorized by Section 1902(r) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(r)).

(3) (A) For the purposes of calculating countable income under this section, an income exemption shall be applied as necessary to adjust the income standard so that it is the same as the income standard that was in place on May 1, 2009.

(B) This additional income exemption shall cease to be implemented when the SSI/SSP program payment levels increase beyond those
 in effect on May 1, 2009.

(C) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this paragraph by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction without taking regulatory action.

(4) Retained earned income of an eligible individual who is receiving health care benefits under this section shall be considered an exempt resource when held in a separately identifiable account and not commingled with other resources, as authorized by Section 1902(r)(2) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(r)(2)).

(5) Social security disability income that converts to social security retirement income upon the retirement of an individual, including any increases in the amount of that income, shall be exempt. The
 department shall submit a state plan amendment for this specific exemption, and the exemption shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the state plan amendment is approved.

(c) All resources exempted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) for an individual who is receiving health care benefits under this section shall continue to be exempt under any other Medi-Cal program that is subject to Section 1902(r)(2) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(r)(2)) under which the beneficiary later becomes eligible for medical assistance where that eligibility is based on age, blindness, or disability. The department shall submit a state plan amendment for this specific exemption, and the exemption shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the state plan amendment is approved.

(d) After an individual is determined eligible for Medi-Cal
 benefits under this section, the individual’s countable income, as determined under Section 1612 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1382a), shall be used to determine the amount of the individual’s required premium payment, as described in subdivision (f), when applicable. Disability income and converted retirement income made exempt under paragraphs (1) and (5), respectively, of subdivision (b) for eligibility purposes shall be considered countable income for purposes of determining the amount of the required premium payment.

(e) Medi-Cal benefits provided under this chapter pursuant to this section shall be available in the same amount, duration, and scope as those benefits are available for persons who are eligible for Medi-Cal benefits as categorically needy persons and as specified in Section 14007.5.

(f) Individuals
 eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under this section shall be subject to the payment of premiums determined under this subdivision, except as provided in subdivision
 (k). Each individual shall pay a monthly premium that is equal to 5 percent of their individual countable income, as described in subdivision (d), or if the deeming of spousal income of an ineligible spouse applies, a monthly premium that is equal to 5 percent of the total countable income of both spouses, except that the minimum premium payment per eligible individual shall be twenty dollars ($20) per month, and the maximum premium payment per eligible individual shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per month.

(g) In order to implement the collection of premiums under this section, the department may develop and execute a contract with a public or private entity to collect premiums, or may amend any existing or future premium-collection contract that it has executed. Notwithstanding any other law, any contract developed and executed or amended pursuant to this subdivision is exempt from the approval of the Director of General Services and from the Public Contract Code.

(h) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement, without taking any regulatory action, this section by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of
 Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the department determines that federal financial participation is available pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and only to the extent that the department seeks and obtains approval of all necessary Medicaid state plan amendments.

(j) If any provision of this section, or its application, is held invalid by a final judicial determination, it shall cease to be implemented. A determination of invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect without the implementation of the invalid provision or application.

(k) (1) Effective July 1, 2022, to the extent allowable under federal law, and notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, the department may elect not to impose premiums on individuals eligible
 under this section for an applicable coverage period.

(2) If the department elects to not impose premiums for an applicable coverage period pursuant to paragraph (1) or elects to reinstate such premiums for a subsequent coverage period, the department shall specify that election in the published Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate for the impacted state fiscal year or years, subject to appropriation by the annual Budget Act.

(l) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 101) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 78.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.9.

(a) (1) The department shall adopt the option made available under Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XIII) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XIII)). In order to be eligible for benefits under this section, an individual shall be required to meet all of the following requirements:

(A) The individual’s net countable income is less than 250 percent of the federal poverty level for one person or, if the deeming of spousal income applies to the individual, the individual’s net countable income is less than 250 percent of the federal poverty level for two persons.

(B) The individual is disabled under Title II of the federal Social Security Act (42
 U.S.C. Sec. 401 et seq.), Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.), or Section 1902(v) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(v)). An individual shall be determined to be eligible under this section without regard to their ability to engage in, or actual engagement in, substantial gainful activity, as defined in Section 223(d)(4) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 423(d)(4)).

(C) Resources that are not counted as income shall not be included in determinations of eligibility.

(2) To the extent federal financial participation is available, an individual otherwise eligible under this section, but who is temporarily unemployed, may elect to remain on Medi-Cal under this section for up to 26 weeks, provided the individual continues to pay premiums during the temporary period of unemployment, for coverage periods in
 which premiums are imposed.

(b) Countable   income shall be determined under Section 1612 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1382a), except that the individual’s disability income, including all federal and state disability benefits and private disability insurance, shall be exempted.

(1) For the purposes of calculating countable income under this section, an income exemption shall be applied as necessary to adjust the income standard so that it is the same as the income standard that was in place on May 1, 2009.

(2) This additional income exemption shall cease to be implemented when the SSI/SSP program payment levels increase beyond those in effect on May 1, 2009.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1
 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this paragraph by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction without taking regulatory action.

(4) Social security disability income that converts to social security retirement income upon the retirement of an individual, including any increases in the amount of that income, shall be exempt. The department shall submit a state plan amendment for this specific exemption, and the exemption shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the state plan amendment is approved.

(c) After an individual is determined eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under this section, the individual’s countable income, as determined under Section 1612 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1382a), shall be used to determine the amount of the individual’s required premium payment, as described in
 subdivision (f), when applicable. Disability income and converted retirement income made exempt under paragraphs (1) and (3), respectively, of subdivision (b) for eligibility purposes shall be considered countable income for purposes of determining the amount of the required premium payment.

(d) Medi-Cal benefits provided under this chapter pursuant to this section shall be available in the same amount, duration, and scope as those benefits are available for persons who are eligible for Medi-Cal benefits as categorically needy persons and as specified in Section 14007.5.

(e) (1) Individuals eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under this section shall be subject to the payment of premiums determined under this subdivision, except as provided in subdivision (m). Each individual shall pay a monthly premium that is equal to 5 percent of their individual countable
 income, as described in subdivision (c), or if the deeming of spousal income of an ineligible spouse applies, a monthly premium that is equal to 5 percent of the total countable income of both spouses, except that the minimum premium payment per eligible individual shall be twenty dollars ($20) per month, and the maximum premium payment per eligible individual shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per month.

(2) The amendments made to this subdivision by Chapter 282 of the Statutes of 2009 shall be implemented no later than 90 days after the operative date specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (j).

(f) In order to implement the collection of premiums under this section, the department may develop and execute a contract with a public or private entity to collect premiums, or may amend any existing or future premium-collection contract that it has executed. Notwithstanding
 any other law, any contract developed and executed or amended pursuant to this subdivision is exempt from the approval of the Director of General Services and from the Public Contract Code.

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement, without taking any regulatory action, this section by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the department determines that federal financial participation is available pursuant to Title XIX of the federal
 Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and only to the extent that the department seeks and obtains approval of all necessary Medicaid state plan amendments.

(i) If any provision of this section, or its application, is held invalid by a final judicial determination, it shall cease to be implemented. A determination of invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect without the implementation of the invalid provision or application.

(j) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the amendments made to this section by Chapter 282 of the Statutes of 2009 shall not become operative until 30 days after the date that the increase in the state’s federal medical assistance percentage (FMAP) pursuant to the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) is no longer available
 under that act or any extension of that act.

(2) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 282 of the Statutes of 2009 contained in subdivisions (c) and (e) shall not become operative until 30 days after the date that the director executes a declaration stating that the implementation of subdivisions (c) and (e) will not jeopardize the state’s ability to receive federal financial participation under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) or any amendment or extension of that act, any increase in the FMAP available on or after October 1, 2008, or any additional federal funds that the director, in consultation with the Department of Finance, determines would be advantageous to the state.

(3) If at any time the director determines that the statement in the declaration executed pursuant to paragraph (2) may no longer be accurate, the director
 shall give notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and to the Department of Finance. After giving notice, the amendments made to this section by Chapter 282 of the Statutes of 2009 contained in subdivisions (c) and (e) shall become inoperative on the date that the director executes a declaration stating that the department has determined, in consultation with the Department of Finance, that it is necessary to cease to implement subdivisions (c) and (e) in order to receive federal financial participation, any increase in the FMAP available on or after October 1, 2008, or any additional federal funds that the director, in consultation with the Department of Finance, has determined would be advantageous to the state, in which case, subdivision (c) of this section, as stated by Section 32 of Chapter 5 of the Fourth Extraordinary Session of the Statutes of 2009, shall be operative.

(4) The director shall post a declaration made pursuant to
 paragraph (2) or (3) on the department’s internet website and the director shall send the declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel.

(k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement subdivision (j) by means of all-county letters or similar instruction, without taking regulatory action.

(l) (1) Effective July 1, 2022, to the extent allowable under federal law, and notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, the department may elect not to impose premiums on individuals eligible under this section for an applicable coverage period.

(2) If the department elects to not impose premiums
 for an applicable coverage period pursuant to paragraph (1) or elects to reinstate such premiums for a subsequent coverage period, the department shall specify that election in the published Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate for the impacted state fiscal year or years, subject to appropriation by the annual Budget Act.

(m) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 102) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 79.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 78 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14008.

(a) No relative, other than the spouse, shall be held to be financially responsible for the cost of health care received by an adult eligible under this chapter, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) Except as provided in Section 14010, no relative, other than the parent or parents of a child under the age of 18 years, or a child over the age of 18 years if a parent claims the child as a dependent in order to receive a tax credit or deduction for purposes of state or federal income taxation, shall be held to be financially
 responsible for the cost of health care or related services received by such child, otherwise eligible under this chapter.

(c) To the extent permitted by federal law, the parent or parents shall have such financial responsibility for any child 18 years of age or older but under the age of 21 years who is living in the home of the parent or parents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1594, Sec. 25.   Effective September 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14008.6.

(a) As a condition of eligibility for medical services provided under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), each applicant or beneficiary shall do all of the following:
